src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON BÅRRE  !!= @CODE@ participles without the -s attributive. As 1e in Spiik. Sg Acc: bårrev, Attr: bårre. Spiik: presens particip har med den attributiva formen utan -s betydelsen ºdem  som utför handlingenº.
      :%>   ATTR_PrsPrc       ;
      :%>   NE-EVENCASEadj    ;
      :%>X4 ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
      :%>Q4 N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
      :%>   MUORRACmp         ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: ednabårre # Even-syllable test
!!€ ednabårre:              ednabårre+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ ednabårrev:             ednabårre+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ ednabårre:              ednabårre+A+Attr


!LEXICON DÁBBELIJ !!= @CODE@ presenty only for "Dábbelij". Sg Acc: dábbelaháv, Attr: dábbelij. Similar forms are analyzed as adpositions and adverbss (dábbela, dábbelin). This lexica is thus outcommented as it is not an adjective.
!                 +Sg+Nom:ij%>   K                 ;
!                       :ij%>   ATTR              ;
! :ij VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
! +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ahá%>  PxV               ; !
!                    +Ess:ahá%>n K-CONS            ;
!                        :ahá%>  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
!                        :ahá%>  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
!        +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahá%>t K-CONS            ;
!                        :ahá%>  BU/MUS            ;
!               +Cmp/SgGen:ahá%>  R                 ;
!               +Cmp/PlGen:ahá%>j R                 ;

!! Test data:
!!!€gt-norm: dábbelij # Even-syllable test
!!!€ dábbelij             dábbelij+A+Sg+Nom
!!!€ dábbelaháv           dábbelij+A+Sg+Acc
!!!€ dábbelij             dábbelij+A+Attr
!!!€ dábbelaháp           dábbelij+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 


!!
!! Loan words lexicas
!!


!! ###  Correctly assimilated loanwords, derived from real noun.


LEXICON METÅVDÅLASJ !!= @CODE@ LOAN! Foreign -isk adjectives adapted in updated normative way. To smj ending -alasj, adjective is truly derived from a noun. Mekanisk-mekanihkka-mekanihkalasj, instead of mekánalasj that goes to MEKÁNALASJ_BADASS. Pred and attr are both -alasj. Attr same as pred. With comparatives. 

+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;


LEXICON METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@

                        :asj%>      ATTR              ;
                 +Sg+Nom:asj%>      K-CONS            ;
                 +Sg+Ill:attja%>j   K-CONS            ;
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:adtja%>j   K-CONS            ;
                    +Ess:attja%>n   K-CONS            ;
           +Err/Orth+Ess:adtja%>n   K-CONS            ;
                        :attja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ; !This seems right. TO
                        :%>         ABBO/AMOS         ;
      +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:attja%>t   K-CONS            ;
              +Cmp/SgNom:asj%>      R                 ;
              +Cmp/SgGen:lattja%>   R                 ;
              +Cmp/PlGen:lattja%>j  R                 ;
      
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:attja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:attja%>    PxV               ; !
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:adtja%>s%> PxCi              ; !
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:adtja%>    PxV               ; !                
                
           +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:ahttja%>j   K-CONS            ;
              +Err/Orth+Ess:ahttja%>n   K-CONS            ;
                  +Err/Orth:ahttja%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ; 
+Err/Orth+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:ahttja%>t   K-CONS            ;               

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: kapitalismalasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ kapitalismalasj:             kapitalismalasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ kapitalismalattjav:          kapitalismalasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ kapitalismalasj:             kapitalismalasj+A+Attr
!!€ kapitalismalabbo:            kapitalismalasj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom 


LEXICON MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ !!= @CODE@ LOAN! Same type of adjectives as METÅVDÅLASJ, only for adjektives that become mekanihkalasj in norway and mekanijkalasj in sweden, because of differences mekanik vs mekanikk>mekanijkka vs mekanihkka.  Attr same as pred. With comparatives. 

+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last+Area/NO:ihkal%> METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last+Area/SE:ijkal%> METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;


LEXICON IJJALASJ !!= @CODE@ Just lik  METÅVDÅLASJ only for words ending on ijjalasj/iddjalasj, so that we don't need a lot of Area and Err tags in stems file.

+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: IJJALASJ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON IJJALASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@

         +Area/NO:ijjal   METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
         +Area/SE:idjal   METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
        +Err/Orth:ial     METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
        +Err/Orth:iddjal  METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
        +Err/Orth:ijal    METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
        +Err/Orth:al      METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
  

LEXICON OGIJJALASJ !!= @CODE@ Just like IJJALASJ only for words ending on ogijjalasj/ogiddjalasj, so that we don't need a lot of err tags in stems files. For words like "pedagogijjalasj" which also have "pedagåvgålasj" (not really a wrong derivation, but doesn't mean pedagogisk) and "pedagogalasj" err taged.  
 
+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: OGIJJALASJ_CMP_INFL ;
  
LEXICON OGIJJALASJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ 
  
  +Area/NO:ogijjal   METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
  +Area/SE:ogidjal   METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
 +Err/Orth:ogiddjal  METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
 +Err/Orth:ogijal    METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
 +Err/Orth:ogial     METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
 +Err/Orth:ogal      METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
 +Err/Orth:åvgål     METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ; !Not really a wrong derivation but it means someting else than the norwegian -isk adjective. "Pedagåvgålasj" we get from the noun pedagåvggå. 

LEXICON SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL !!= @CODE@ -sjonal/sjonell and -tional/tionel loanwords. Only for words that work as nouns, so that they are REAL dervations, as nasjonal-nasjåvnnå-nasjåvnålasj. NOT for words like "rasjonell", with no real noun. Words as "rasjonell>rasjonálla-rasjonálalasj" go to lexicon ÁLLA.  The fake derivation "nasjonálalasj" is err taged, so is the strange "nasjonálla/nasjunálla". 

+OLang/NOB: SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ 

                            +CmpNP/Last:sjåvnål       METÅVDÅLASJ_CMP_INFL ;
        +Err/Orth+Use/-Spell+CmpNP/Last:sjon         ÁLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP  ; ! Makes BADASS "nasjonálalasj/nasjoalaladj,nasjonállalasj,nasjonállá, nasjonalla, nasjonella, nasjnælla"
        +Err/Orth+Use/-Spell+CmpNP/Last:sjun         ÁLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP  ; ! 
+Err/Orth+Area/SE+Use/-Spell+CmpNP/Last:tion         ÁLA_LASJ_INFL_CMP  ; ! 

                     +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:sjonal%> R    ; !Short cmp "nasjonalvárre"
            +Err/Orth+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:sjonál%> R    ; !Short cmp
            +Err/Orth+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:sjunál%> R    ; !Short cmp


! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: konstitusjåvnålasj # Even-syllable test
!!€ nasjåvnålasj:             nasjåvnålasj+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ nasjåvnålattjav:          nasjåvnålasj+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ nasjåvnålasj:             nasjåvnålasj+A+Attr
  


LEXICON SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL !!= @CODE@ -sjonal/sjonell and -tional/tionel loanwords. Only for words that work as nouns, so that they are REAL dervations, as nasjonal-nasjåvnnå-nasjåvnålasj. NOT for words like "rasjonell", with no real noun. Words as "rasjonell>rasjonálla-rasjonálalasj" go to lexicon ÁLLA.  The fake derivation "nasjonálalasj" is err taged, so is the strange "nasjonálla/nasjunálla". 

+OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Last: SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL_CMP_INFL ;
