src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
allergijjalasj+A:allerg IJJALASJ ;
anatomijjalasj+A:anatom IJJALASJ ;
arkeologijjalasj+A:arkeol OGIJJALASJ ;
avtadimensjåvnålasj+A:avta#dimen SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL ; ! ! ^LOAN
biologijjalasj+A:biol OGIJJALASJ ;
bioteknologijjalasj+A:bio#teknol OGIJJALASJ ;
bårre+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bårºre BÅRRE ;
demografijjalasj+A:demo^graf IJJALASJ ; !^LOAN
didaktihkalasj+A:didakt MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ;
dimensjåvnålasj+A:dimen SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL ; ! ! ^LOAN
dramatihkalasj+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dramat MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ;
dutkamstratesjijjalasj+A+Err/Orth:dutkam#strateg IJJALASJ ;
ednabårre+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:edna#bårºre BÅRRE ;
eksperimentalasj+A+Area/NO:eksperimental METÅVDÅLASJ ; ! ! ^LOAN
elektronihkalasj+A:elektron MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ; !LOAN
emosjåvnålasj+A:emo SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL ; ! ! ^LOAN
epihkalasj+A:ep MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ; !LOAN
epåvsålasj+A:epåvsål METÅVDÅLASJ; ! What
estetihkalasj+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:estet MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ ;
etihkalasj+A:et MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ; !LOAN
etnografijjalasj+A:etno^graf IJJALASJ ;
etnologijjalasj+A:etnol OGIJJALASJ ;
filmatihkalasj+A:filmat MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ; !^LOAN
fonologijjalasj+A:fonol OGIJJALASJ ;
funksjåvnålasj+A:funk SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL ; ! ! LOAN
fylkkasuohkanlasj+A+Err/Der:fylkka#suohkanl METÅVDÅLASJ;
fáhkapolitihkalasj+A:fáhka#polit MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ;
geografijjalasj+A:geo^graf IJJALASJ ;
geologijjalasj+A:geol OGIJJALASJ ;
giellaestetihkalasj+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:giella#estet MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ;
giellasosiologijjalasj+A:giella#sosiol OGIJJALASJ ;
giellateknologijjalasj+A:giella#teknol OGIJJALASJ ;
guovtedimensjåvnålasj+A:guovte#dimen SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL ; ! ! ^LOAN
gynekologijjalasj+A:gynekol OGIJJALASJ ;
gáddjo+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gádºdjo BÅRRE ;
gålmådimensjåvnålasj+A:gålmå#dimen SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL ; ! LOAN
hierarkijjalasj+A:hier^ark IJJALASJ ;
histårjålasj+A+Area/SE:histårjål METÅVDÅLASJ ;
humanismalasj+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:humanismal METÅVDÅLASJ;
hæggagáddjo+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hægga#gádºdjo BÅRRE ;
idiologijjalasj+A:idio^l OGIJJALASJ ;
iehpeformalalasj+A:iehpe#formalal METÅVDÅLASJ; ! ÁLLA
iehpeharmonijjalasj+A+Err/Orth:iehpe#hármon IJJALASJ ;
iesjmanne+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:iesj#manºne BÅRRE ;
implikasjåvnålasj+A+Area/NO:im^plika SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL ; ! ! ^LOAN
industrijjalasj+A:indu^str IJJALASJ ; ! ! ^LOAN
intensjåvnålasj+A:inten SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL ; ! ! LOAN
internasjåvnålasj+A:inter#na SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL ; ! LOAN
intertevstalasj+A:inter#tevstal METÅVDÅLASJ ; ! ^LOAN
juridihkalasj+A:jurid MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ ; ! LOAN
konstitusjåvnålasj+A:kon^stitu SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL ; ! ^LOAN
kronologijjalasj+A:kronol OGIJJALASJ ;
kultuvralasj+A:kultuvral METÅVDÅLASJ; ! LOAN
margijnalasj+A:margijnal METÅVDÅLASJ ; ! LOAN
matematihkalasj+A:matemat MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ;
morfologijjalasj+A:morfol OGIJJALASJ ;
morálalasj+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:morálal METÅVDÅLASJ; ! LOAN
multifunksjåvnålasj+A:multi#funk SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL ; ! ^LOAN
nasjåvnålasj+A+Err/Orth:nat SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL ; ! LOAN
nasjåvnålasj+A:na SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL ; ! LOAN
nuorajpsykiatrijjalasj+A:nuoraj#psykiatr IJJALASJ ; !LOAN
observasjåvnålasj+A:observa SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL ; ! ! ^LOAN
parlamentarismalasj+A:parlamentarismal METÅVDÅLASJ ;
pedagogihkalasj+A+Err/Orth:pedag OGIJJALASJ ;
pedagogihkalasj+A:pedagog MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ ;
poesijjalasj+A:poes IJJALASJ ;
praktihkalasj+A+Err/Orth:prahkt MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ; ! tt
praktihkalasj+A:prakt MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ; !
prinsihpalasj+A+Area/NO:prinsihpal METÅVDÅLASJ; ! LOAN
profesjåvnålasj+A:profe SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL ; ! ! LOAN
projeksjåvnålasj+A:projek SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL ; ! ! ^LOAN
proporsjåvnålasj+A:propor SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL ; ! LOAN
psykalasj+A:psykal METÅVDÅLASJ; !LOAN what feil
relasjåvnålasj+A:rela SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONELL ; ! ! ^LOAN
semantihkalasj+A:semant MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ;
seremonijjalasj+A:seremon IJJALASJ ;
sosialismalasj+A+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sosi^alistal METÅVDÅLASJ; ! Feil, gjelder ikke sosialister XXX check
sosiologijjalasj+A+Area/NO:sosiol OGIJJALASJ ;
statistihkalasj+A:statist MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ; ! LOAN
stratesjijjalasj+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stratesj IJJALASJ ;
symmetrijjalasj+A:symmetr IJJALASJ ;
syntávsalasj+A:syntávsal METÅVDÅLASJ; ! LOAN
teknihkalasj+A:tekn MEKANIHKA_MEKANIJKA_LASJ;
teologijjalasj+A:teol OGIJJALASJ ;
topografijjalasj+A:topo^graf IJJALASJ ;
viesso+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viesºso BÅRRE ; ! levende
vájllo+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vájllo BÅRRE ;
ássjeguosske+A+Err/Cmp+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ássjáj#guosske BÅRRE ; ! wrong first part of cmp
ássjeguosske+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ássje#guosske BÅRRE ; ! 
ålggorijkalasj+A:ålggo#rijkal METÅVDÅLASJ;
åvtådimensjåvnålasj+A:åvtå#dimen SJÅNÅLASJ_SJONAL ; ! LOAN
økologijjalasj+A+Area/SE:ekol OGIJJALASJ ;
økonomijjalasj+A+Area/NO:økonom IJJALASJ ;
